Alabama, session 2026rs, HB410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-42-230, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§45-42-230
(a) Beginning with the next term of office, the Sheriff
of Limestone County shall receive an annual salary that is 85
percent of the annual salary of the highest paid Thirty-ninth
Judicial Circuit Court Judge.
(b) Beginning January 18, 2027, the Sheriff of
Limestone County shall receive a base annual salary of one
hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($149,000) per annum. This
salary shall be in lieu of the salary provided in subsection
(a) which shall be void.
(c) The sheriff shall continue to receive the same
cost-of-living increases and other uniform increases as
granted to all county employees by the county commission.
(b)(d) The sheriff shall not personally financially
benefit from the food account used for the feeding of county
and state prisoners."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB410 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 17-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 03-Mar-26 Passed



Page 2